Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.42.040

City clerks and controllers.

In addition to any specific enumeration of duties of city clerks in a code city's charter or ordinances, and without limiting the generality of RCW 35A.21.030 of this title, the clerks of all code cities shall perform the following duties in the manner prescribed, to wit: (1) Certification of city streets as part of the highway system in accordance with the provisions of RCW 47.24.010; (2) perform the functions of a member of a firefighters' pension board as provided by RCW 41.16.020; (3) keep a record of ordinances of the city and provide copies thereof as authorized by RCW 5.44.080; (4) serve as applicable the trustees of any police relief and pension board as authorized by RCW 41.20.010; and (5) serve as secretary-treasurer of volunteer firefighters' relief and pension boards as provided in RCW 41.24.060.

[ 2013 c 23 s 65; 1991 c 81 s 39; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.